{"train": [{"text": "The U.S. Attorney's Office for the District of Columbia today announced criminal charges in connection with an alleged sexual assault that occurred at a nonprofit organization's facility. The criminal charges, filed in federal court in Washington D.C., charge a former employee of the nonprofit organization with gross negligence and intentional misconduct. The nonprofit organization is not liable for the conduct of the former employee, who has not been charged with a crime. The law provides that a business entity is not subject to civil liability for an injury or death that occurs at a facility of the business entity if the use occurs outside of the scope of business of that business entity. The business entity's liability is limited to the amount of money it would have to pay to the nonprofit for the use of the facility, and it is not required to pay for the nonprofit's use of a facility if the nonprofit uses the facility for public benefit and operates primarily for charitable, civic, educational, religious, welfare, or health purposes. The laws of the several States, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, the Virgin Islands, Guam, American Samoa, the Northern Mariana Islands, any other territory or possession of the United States, or any political subdivision of any such State, territory, or possession, are inconsistent with this Act. The Act does not preempt any State law that provides additional protection from liability for business entities for injuries or death with respect to which conditions under subparagraphs (b) and (c) of subsections (e) of the Act apply. The provisions of this Act are not to supersede any Federal or State health and safety law.", "summary": "Shields a business entity from civil liability relating to any injury or death occurring at a facility of that entity in connection with a use of such facility by a nonprofit organization if: (1) the use occurs outside the scope of business of the business entity; (2) such injury or death occurs during a period that such facility is used by such organization; and (3) the business entity authorized the use of such facility by the organization. \nMakes this Act inapplicable to an injury or death that results from an act or omission of a business entity that constitutes gross negligence or intentional misconduct, including misconduct that: (1) constitutes a hate crime or a crime of violence or act of international terrorism for which the defendant has been convicted in any court; or (2) involves a sexual offense for which the defendant has been convicted in any court or misconduct for which the defendant has been found to have violated a Federal or State civil rights law. \nPreempts State laws to the extent that such laws are inconsistent with this Act, except State law that provides additional protection from liability.  Specifies that this Act shall not be construed to supersede any Federal or State health or safety law. \nMakes this Act inapplicable to any civil action in a State court against a business entity in which all parties are citizens of the State if such State, citing this Act's authority and containing no other provision, enacts a statute declaring the State's election that this Act shall not apply to such action in the State.", "title": "A bill to limit the civil liability of business entities providing use of facilities to nonprofit organizations."}, {"text": "The United States considers the national and international protection and promotion of human rights and the rule of law the most important values of any democracy. The founding fathers defined human rights prominently in the Bill of Rights, giving those rights a special priority and protection in the Constitution.<n>The United States will continue to receive requests from foreign authorities for legal assistance regarding human rights violations, including the declassification of documents. In addition to requests by Guatemala and Honduras, a Spanish court magistrate, Baltasar Garzon, recently requested from the United States information on General Augusto Pinochet.<n>As a member State of the Organization of American States, the U.S. should seek to follow the December 8, 1998, recommendation of the Inter-American Commission on Human Rights. The Clarification Commission explicitly recommended that all available legal and material resources should be utilized to clarify the whereabouts of the disappeared and, in the case of death, to deliver the remains to relatives.The Securities and Exchange Commission today issued an order requiring the U.S. Department of State to declassify and disclose information about human rights violations in Guatemala and Honduras. The SEC's order follows a request from the National Commissioner for the Protection of Human Rights in the Republic of Honduras, which has been seeking the information since November 1993 .<n>The order requires the State Department, the Agency for International Development, the Central Intelligence Agency, the National Reconnaissance Office, the Department of Justice, and the Executive Office of the President to identify, review, and organize all human rights records regarding activities occurring in the two countries after 1944 for the purpose of declassifying and disclosing the records to the public. According to the order, the public disclosure of the human rights record would reveal the name or identity of a living individual who provided confidential information to the United States and would pose a substantial risk of harm to that individual. The order further states that the information would not interfere with the conduct of intelligence operations and would be so harmful as to outweigh the public interest in the disclosure of such information.In the event that an agency of the United States receives a request for human rights records from an entity created by the United Nations, the Organization of American States or a similar entity, a national truth commission or entity of similar nature, or from the principal justice or human rights official of a country that is investigating a pattern of gross violations of internationally recognized human rights, the agency shall conduct a review of the records and shall declassify and publicly disclose such records in accordance with the standards and procedures set forth in this Act.<n>Not later than 30 days after the Appeals Panel's determination and notification to the agency pursuant to subsection (b)(4), the President shall report to Congress on the desirability and feasibility of declassification. The report shall be available to the public. The Appeals Panel shall publish in the Federal Register a copy of any unclassified written certification, statement, and other materials transmitted by or on behalf of the President with regard to the postponement of disclosure of a human rights record.The President shall appoint individuals who are not employees of the United States who have demonstrated substantial human rights expertise and who are able to meet the security requirements for the positions.<n>The President shall seek recommendations with respect to such positions from nongovernmental human rights organizations.", "summary": "Human Rights Information Act - Requires certain Federal agencies to identify and organize all human rights records regarding activities occurring in Guatemala and Honduras after 1944 for declassification and disclosure purposes, and to make them available to the public. \nInstructs the President to report to Congress regarding agency compliance. \nPrescribes guidelines under which the Interagency Security Classification Appeals Panel shall review agency determinations to postpone public disclosure of any human rights record.  Authorizes postponement of such public disclosures on specified grounds. \nRequires any U.S. agency, upon request by an entity created by the United Nations, the Organization of American States (or similar entity), a national truth commission (or similar entity), or from the principal justice or human rights official of a country that is investigating a pattern of gross violations of internationally recognized human rights, to review, declassify, and publicly disclose any human pertinent rights records. \nDirects the Information Security Policy Advisory Council to report to Congress on declassification of human rights records relating to other countries and to make such report available to the public. \nCreates two additional positions in the Panel in order to implement this Act.", "title": "Human Rights Information Act"}, {"text": "In commemoration of the 50th anniversary of the breaking of the color barrier in major league baseball by Jackie Robinson, the Secretary of the Treasury (hereafter in this Act) shall mint and issue not more than 500,000 1 dollar coins, which shall-- (1) weigh 26.73 grams; (2) have a diameter of 1.500 inches; and (3) contain 90 percent silver and 10 percent copper. The coins minted under this Act shall be legal tender, as provided in section 5103 of title 31, United States Code. The Secretary shall accept pre-paid orders for the coins from the Jackie Robinson Foundation for the purpose of enhancing the programs of the Foundation in the field of education and youth leadership skills development. The sale of the coins will be conducted by the Secretary at a price equal to the sum of the face value of the coin and the cost of designing and issuing the coins, including labor, materials, dies, use of machinery, overhead expenses, marketing, and shipping. The coin design will be emblematic of Jackie Robinson's association with and contributions to Major League Baseball. The inscriptions on the coin will be \"In God We Trust,\" \"United States of America,\" and \"E Pluribus Unum\"A coin shall not be issued under this Act unless the Secretary has received full payment for the coin and security satisfactory to the Secretary from a depository institution whose deposits are insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation or the National Credit Union Administration Board. The Secretary may waive the application of any paragraph of this subsection to the Foundation for any fiscal year after taking into account the amount of payments received by the Foundation in each fiscal year.<n>The Foundation shall provide, as a condition for receiving any payment derived from the proceeds of any surcharge imposed on the sale of coins, an annual audit, in accordance with generally accepted government auditing standards. The Foundation may use any amount received from such payments to pay the cost of an audit required under paragraph (1), which may relate to the receipt or expenditure of any such amount by the foundation.<n>No portion of any payment to the foundation may be used, directly or indirectly, to compensate any agent or attorney for services rendered to support or influence in any way legislative action of the Congress relating to the coins minted and issued under the Act.", "summary": "Jackie Robinson Commemorative Coin Act - Directs the Secretary of the Treasury to:  (1) mint and issue one-dollar silver coins emblematic of Jackie Robinson in commemoration of the 50th anniversary of the breaking of the color barrier in major league baseball; and (2) distribute surcharge proceeds to the Jackie Robinson Foundation to enhance its education and youth leadership programs, and increase the availability of scholarships for economically disadvantaged youths.", "title": "Jackie Robinson Commemorative Coin Act"}, {"text": "The Internal Revenue Code of 1986 amended to provide that the cost of any eligible small business investment purchased by the taxpayer during the 12-month period beginning on the date of such sale, reduced by (2) any portion of such cost previously taken into account under this section. In the case of the sale of any capital asset with respect to which the taxpayer elects the application of this section, gain from such sale shall be recognized only to the extent that the amount realized on such sale exceeds the taxpayer's cost of such investment. The term qualified small business entity' means any domestic corporation or partnership in which the stock or partnership interest was issued and each prior taxable year, such entity had gross receipts of less than $5,000,000, (i) for the taxable year of such entity in which such entity generated income from investment property and the majority of full-time employees employed by such entity are located in the United States. For purposes of section 1043(b)(4), the term \"investment property\" means property that has the capacity to produce gross income from an interest, annuities, or royalties, not derived in the ordinary course of a trade or business, or that is directly involved in the primary activity referred to in clause (ii), transportation, communications, agriculture, and sanitary service. The Secretary may further define by regulation what constitutes an incidental holding of investment property with regard to such entity. For example, ownership interests in entities controlled by such entities do not constitute investment property, and the Secretary may treat such entities as a single employer under subparagraph (A) of subsection (B) of section 52 of the IRS Code. The provisions of the new law will be implemented on January 1, 2015 and will be effective for the 2015 tax year.The U.S. Department of the Treasury has issued new rules for determining the basis of a small business investment that is purchased by the taxpayer during the 12-month period described in subsection (a) of section 1044 of the Internal Revenue Code. The new rules apply only to investments purchased after the date of the enactment of this Act, for taxable years ending after such date. The rules are designed to prevent the avoidance of the purposes of this section through splitups, shell corporations, partnerships, or otherwise. The Treasury's Office of Investor Education and Advocacy (OIEA) has issued guidance on the new rules. The guidance is available on the OIEA's website.", "summary": "Amends the Internal Revenue Code to provide (temporarily) for the nontaxable rollover of gain from qualified small business stock to another small business stock.", "title": "To amend the Internal Revenue Code to provide that capital gains not be recognized if invested in certain small businesses."}, {"text": "The Securities and Exchange Commission today issued a new rule that requires the U.S. Department of the Interior's Bureau of Land Management (BLM) to approve or disapprove any oil and gas appraisal conducted by an Indian tribe on federal lands. The new rule is the result of an amendment to the Energy Policy Act of 1992 (EPA) that was passed by Congress in June 1992 and signed into law by President George W. Bush on July 10, 1992 . According to the SEC's amended version of the EPA, each affected Indian tribe is required to submit to the Secretary of Interior a written notice of approval or disapproval of an appraisal conducted pursuant to the provisions of this rule within 30 days of the date on which the Secretary receives the appraisal. The appraisal must be conducted by a certified, third-party appraiser pursuant to a contract with the Indian tribe. In the event that the appraisal is not approved or disapproved by the Secretary, the tribe may waive the requirements of subsection (a) of this section, including the need to provide a written waiver pursuant to subsection (c) of the Act. The Secretary may, after 60 days, develop regulations for implementing this rule, including standards for approving or disapproving appraisals, including unambiguous numbers, tracking systems, and other estimates of value. The agency shall use a uniform system of unambiguous numbers and tracking systems for oil and natural gas activities on Indian lands. As soon as after the date of this Act, the Secretary shall implement procedures to ensure that each of the affected Indian tribes that is involved in the review, approval, and oversight of energy-related activities on Federal lands is conducted in a manner that is consistent with the laws, regulations, and policies of the United States. The use of these procedures will be limited to the use of a single, unambiguous number and tracking system, and the agency shall be able to determine the fair market value of any oil or gas wells on the affected lands.The Secretary of the Interior, acting through the Bureau of Land Management, shall not collect any fee for any of the following: (1) For an application for a permit to drill on Indian land. (2) To conduct any oil or gas inspection activity on Indian Land. (3) On any oil/gas lease for nonproducing acreage on Indian lands. (4) Clarification of authority.The U.S. Attorney's Office for the Northern District of New York today announced that it has filed a preliminary injunction against the Department of Energy's (D.E.'s) decision to award a contract for a biomass energy demonstration project to a Native American tribe in Alaska. The court granted the tribe's request for a temporary restraining order and preliminary injunction, finding that the agency's decision to grant the contract violated the provisions of Section 10(b) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (Exchange Act) and Rule 10b-5 thereunder. According to the court's order, the agency violated the terms of the Exchange Act by failing to provide the tribe with the information it required to determine whether the project would be eligible for the contract. The order also found that the department's determination that the project was not eligible was based on the fact that the tribe had not provided sufficient information to determine that it would be able to provide reliable supplies of woody biomass from Federal land for the project. In a parallel action, a federal district court in Washington, D.C. issued an emergency order temporarily restraining the agency from issuing the contract to the tribe pending the outcome of the litigation. The SEC's final judgment, which is subject to court approval, is expected to be issued by the end of the month. The litigation will be led by the Assistant Attorney General for the Office of Indian Affairs and the Chief of the Alaska Native Claims Settlement Commission.On August 9, 1955, the U.S. Congress passed and signed into law the National Indian Forest Resources Management Act of 1955, also known as the \"Long-Term Leasing Act\" of 1955. Section 415(e)(1) of the Act provides that leases for the exploration, development, or extraction of mineral resources, including geothermal resources, shall be considered a sustainable management practice for purposes of any Federal standard, benefit, or requirement that requires a demonstration of such sustainability. The Act also provides that no rule promulgated by the Department of the Interior regarding hydraulic fracturing used in the development or production of oil or gas resources shall have any effect on any land held in trust or restricted status for the benefit of Indians except with the express consent of the beneficiary on whose behalf such land is held. The provisions of this Act apply to land leased to the NAVAJO Nation. The NAVAjo Nation is an American Indian tribe located in the northern part of New Mexico. The Bureau of Indian Affairs and the Bureau of Land Management are responsible for the management of the land.", "summary": "Native American Energy Act - (Sec. 3) Amends the Energy Policy Act of 1992 to allow the Secretary of the Interior, an affected Indian tribe, or a certified third-party appraiser under contract with the Indian tribe to appraise Indian land or trust assets involved in a transaction requiring the Secretary's approval.  Deems an appraisal that is conducted by an Indian tribe or by an appraiser under contract with an Indian tribe to be approved if the Secretary does not approve or disapprove of the appraisal within 60 days of receiving it. Gives tribes the option of waiving such appraisals if they give the Secretary an unambiguous indication of tribal intent to do so that includes an express waiver of any claims they might have against the United States that result from forgoing the appraisal. (Sec. 4) Requires each agency within the Department of the Interior involved in the review of oil and gas activities on Indian lands to use a uniform system of reference numbers and tracking systems for oil and gas wells. (Sec. 5) Amends the National Environmental Policy Act of 1969 to make the environmental impact statement for major federal action on Indian lands available for review and comment only to the affected Indian tribe and individuals residing within the affected area. (Sec. 6) Prohibits the Secretary from collecting a fee for: (1) applying for a permit to drill on Indian land, (2) oil or gas inspection activities on such lands, or (3) any oil or gas lease for nonproducing acreage on Indian land. (Sec. 7) Requires plaintiffs who obtain a preliminary injunction or administrative stay in Indian energy related actions to post bond. (Indian energy related actions are those concerned with energy activities undertaken on Indian land or by Indian tribes on other lands.)  Subjects plaintiffs to liability for a defendant's harm should they not ultimately prevail on the merits of the energy related action. Prohibits plaintiffs in Indian energy related actions against the federal government from receiving certain federal payments for their fees or expenses. (Sec. 8) Amends the Tribal Forest Protection Act of 2004 to direct the Secretary to enter into agreements with Indian tribes, from FY2014-FY2018, to carry out demonstration projects that promote biomass energy production on Indian forest land and in nearby communities by providing tribes with reliable supplies of woody biomass from federal lands. Requires the creation of at least four new demonstration projects during each of those fiscal years. Directs the Secretary, when reviewing project applications, to consider whether a proposed demonstration project will:  increase the availability or reliability of local or regional energy, enhance the tribe's economic development, improve the connection of electric power transmission facilities serving the tribe with other electric transmission facilities, improve the forest health or watersheds of federal land or Indian forest land or rangeland, or  otherwise promote woody biomass use.  Directs the Secretary, to the extent practicable, to incorporate management plans in effect on Indian forest land or rangeland into demonstration project agreements affecting those lands. Prohibits the agreements from having a term that exceeds 20 years, but allows them to be renewed for up to ten additional years. (Sec. 9) Considers activities conducted or resources harvested or produced pursuant to a tribal resource management plan or an integrated resource management plan approved by the Secretary to be a sustainable management practice when sustainability is federally required. (Sec. 10) Amends the Long-Term Leasing Act to authorize the Navajo Nation to enter into commercial or agricultural leases of up to 99 years on their restricted lands without the Secretary's approval, provided they are executed under tribal regulations approved by the Secretary.  Allows the Navajo Nation to enter into mineral resource leases on their restricted lands without the Secretary's approval if they are executed under approved tribal regulations and do not exceed 25 years, though they may include a renewal option for one additional term not exceeding 25 years. (Sec. 11) Prohibits any Department of the Interior rule regarding hydraulic fracturing, used in oil and gas development or production, from having any effect on land held in trust or restricted status for Indians, except with the express consent of its Indian beneficiaries.  ", "title": "Native American Energy Act"}, {"text": "The purpose of this Act is to provide information about Holocaust-era insurance policies to Holocaust victims and their heirs and beneficiaries to enable them to file their rightful claims under the policies.<n>As of June 15, 2001, more than 84 percent of the 72,675 claims applications filed with the International Commission on Holocaust Era Insurance Claims remained idle because the claimants could not identify the company holding the policy. The Secretary of Commerce shall establish and maintain a collection of records that shall be known as the Holocaust Insurance Registry. The Archivist of the United States shall make all such information publicly accessible and searchable by means of the Internet and by any other means the Archivist deems appropriate.The Secretary of Commerce shall assess a civil penalty of not less than $5,000 for each day that an insurer fails to comply with the requirements of section 4 of this Act, as determined by the Secretary. The Archivist of the United States may use amounts received by the Government as civil penalties under section 6 to maintain the Holocaust Insurance Registry.<n>Nothing in this Act preempts the right of any State to adopt or enforce any State law requiring an insurer to disclose information regarding insurance policies that may have been confiscated or stolen from victims of Nazi persecution.", "summary": "Holocaust Victims Insurance Relief Act of 2001 - Directs the Archivist of the United States to establish and maintain a Holocaust Insurance Registry to consist of information on holders and issuers (and related liable entities) of Holocaust-era insurance policies that were: (1) in effect after January 30, 1933, and before December 31, 1945; and (2) issued to a policyholder domiciled in any area of Europe that was occupied or controlled by Nazi Germany or any ally or sympathizer during such period.Requires: (1) insurers to file such information in an electronic format with the Secretary of Commerce by a specified deadline; (2) the Secretary to assess a civil penalty for each day an insurer fails to comply; and (3) notify each State's commissioner of insurance of the identity of any insurer that has failed to file such information or to satisfy any penalty.", "title": "To provide for the establishment of the Holocaust Insurance Registry by the Archivist of the United States and to require certain disclosures by insurers to the Secretary of Commerce."}, {"text": "The purpose of this legislation is to increase the number of school-based mental health and student service providers. The current national average ratio of students to school counselors in elementary and secondary schools is 561 to 1. According to the Institute of Medicine of the National Academy of Sciences, the recommended maximum ratio of mental health professionals is 250 to 1; and the recommended ratio of school psychologists and school social workers is 1,000 to 1 and 800 to 1 respectively. In some States, 1 school counselor typically serves over 1,000 students. The number of students expected to grow significantly over the next few years. Model programs have reduced school suspensions, reduced referrals to the principal's office, reduced the use of weapons, and increased student feelings of safety.The purpose of this chapter is to provide funding for the hiring of additional school counselors, school psychologists, and school social workers. The funds will be used to assist local educational agencies in hiring additional school-based mental health and student service providers. To be eligible to receive a grant under this chapter, a State shall submit an application to the Secretary of the Interior in such manner as the State may require. The Secretary may not approve an application under this subsection unless the State presents a plan, which the Secretary considers to be reasonable, under which the State will make grants, in accordance with the purposes of this section.<n>The Secretary shall reallocate to States that have received approval under subsection (e)(2) any funds allocated under this section to states that have not submitted an application that is approved by the Secretary. In the event that a grant is not approved, the State shall provide a matching amount to the amount of funds allocated.The Elementary and Secondary Education Act of 1965 provides for grants to local educational agencies to assist them in hiring additional school-based mental health and student service providers. In each fiscal year, a State may use not more than 5 percent of the assistance made available to it under this subsection for the administrative costs of the State in carrying out the State's responsibilities under this chapter.<n>No grant made by a State in accordance with this subsection shall be for an amount less than $50,000. The State shall use data from the most recent fiscal year for which satisfactory data are available, except that the State may adjust such data, or use alternative child poverty data, if the State demonstrates to the Secretary's satisfaction that such adjusted or alternative data more accurately reflect the relative incidence of children who are living in poverty and who reside in the school districts in the State.<n>A State may require that a local educational agency match a portion of the amount of the grant made to it. The non-Federal share required by this subsection may be provided in cash or in kind, fairly evaluated, and may include facilities, equipment, or services.The purpose of this legislation is to promote the integration of schools and mental health systems. The funding will be used for the promotion of school readiness through early childhood emotional and social development. The funds will also be used to improve the mental health and student service providers.", "summary": "Amends the Elementary and Secondary Education Act of 1965 to establish a program to assist States and local educational agencies (LEAs) to recruit, train, and hire additional school-based mental health and student service providers, including additional school counselors, psychologists, and social workers (in order to reduce the student-to-counselor ratios nationally, in elementary and secondary schools, to an average of one school counselor for every 250 students, one psychologist for every 1,000 students, and one social worker for every 800 students, as recommended in a report by the Institute of Medicine of the National Academy of Sciences relating to schools and health).\n\nDirects the Secretary of Education, after reserving certain funds for schools in outlying areas and schools run by the Bureau of Indian Affairs, to make program allotments to States according to a specified formula. Requires States to allocate funds from Federal and State shares of program costs to LEAs according to specified formulae.", "title": "To amend the Elementary and Secondary Education Act of 1965 to direct the Secretary of Education to make grants to States for assistance in hiring additional school-based mental health and student service providers."}, {"text": "On July 29, 1998, the U.S. Department of Agriculture entered into an Option Agreement with Big Sky Lumber Co., an Oregon joint venture, to acquire approximately 54,000 acres of land in the Gallatin National Forest, located north of Yellowstone National Park in Montana. The terms of the Option Agreement were set out in the Exhibit A to the SEC's July 29, 1998 Report of the Secretary of Agriculture, which was filed in the United States District Court for the District of Montana on July 30, 1998. The Report also included the terms of an exchange agreement between the Secretary and BSL for the acquisition of the land. The Exchange Agreement was signed by BSL and the Secretary on July 29, 1998. BSL's land is located in the Eastside National Forests, which are located east of the Continental Divide in the State of Montana and include the Beaverhead, Deerlodge, Helena, Custer, and Lewis and Clark national forests. The Report found that the land possesses outstanding natural characteristics and wildlife habitats that make it a valuable addition to the National Forest System, reducing long-term costs for taxpayers, increasing public access to the forest, and improving the ownership pattern of the forest. It also found that other private property owners are willing to enter into exchanges that further improve the forest's ownership pattern. In the Report, the Secretary notes that the Exchange Agreement is subject to the approval of the Federal Bureau of Land Management (BLM) and the Montana Department of Fish and Wildlife and Game (MDWFP). The Report concludes that the exchange agreement is not in the best interests of the public and that BSL has not adequately addressed the concerns raised in the Report.The U.S. Department of the Interior's Bureau of Land Management (BLM) announced today that it will implement a timber sale program on portions of the Gallatin National Forest in Montana. According to the terms and conditions of the Option Agreement, the BLM will provide BSL with timber sale receipts from timber sales on the National Forest and other eastside national forests in the State of Montana in accordance with subsections (a) and (c) of the Act. The Option Agreement also provides that BSL will be entitled to receive patents and deeds to an equivalent value of the Federal land held in escrow. The terms of the option agreement are subject to the approval of the BSL board of directors. The option agreement is subject to approval by the Board of Directors of BSL. The Board of Director's approval is not required for BSL to receive timber receipts from the timber sales. The BLM's timber sales program will be funded by the sale of timber from the national forests. The timber sales will be conducted in compliance with the terms of this Act and the provisions of the federal land policy and management act of 1976 and other federal laws and regulations.The U.S. Department of Agriculture's Bureau of Land Management (BLM) is required by the federal land acquisition act of March 1, 1911, to determine the quality of title to land acquired by the BLM. The Secretary of Agriculture is required to determine within 45 days whether the applicable title standards for Federal land acquisition have been satisfied and the title is otherwise acceptable to the Secretary. The BLM is also required to provide the Secretary with a copy of all draft conveyances and closing documents received and approved by BLM in connection with the acquisition of the land. The title includes both the surface and subsurface estates without reservation or exception (except as specifically provided in this Act), including minerals, mineral rights, and mineral interests (including severed oil and gas surface rights). The Secretary is encouraged to pursue a land exchange with the owner of section 1 of the Taylor Fork land after completing a full public process and an appraisal. The land exchange is subject to such minor corrections and adjustments as may be agreed to by the Secretary and BSL, and each member of the Montana congressional delegation of any changes made.On October 2, 1998, the U.S. Senate passed the Land and Water Conservation Fund Act of 1965 and authorized the Secretary of Agriculture to transfer land to the Gallatin National Forest and the Deerlodge National Forest as part of a land-for-land exchange. The land exchange will be conducted in accordance with the terms and conditions of the Option Agreement, which is available for public inspection in the office of the supervisor of the Forest Service. The Secretary will implement a restoration program, including reforestation and watershed enhancements, to bring the acquired land and surrounding national forest land into compliance with Forest Service standards and guidelines. The Act also provides that the Secretary may use partnerships with State and local conservation corps, including the Montana Conservation Corps, to implement the restoration program.", "summary": "Gallatin Land Consolidation Act of 1998 - Provides for the exchange of land and other assets including certain timber harvest rights by the Secretaries of Agriculture and the Interior with the Big Sky Lumber Co. (BSL) for inclusion in the Gallatin National Forest and Deerlodge National Forest, Montana. \nDirects the Secretary of Agriculture to:  (1) implement a timber sale program to fund the purchase of specified (Taylor Fork) BSL land; (2) enter into specified land exchanges (Wapiti and Eightmile-West Pine); and (3) implement a restoration program for lands acquired under this Act.  Encourages the Secretary to pursue a specified land exchange (section 1 of the Taylor Fork land). \nAuthorizes appropriations.", "title": "Gallatin Land Consolidation Act of 1998"}, {"text": "The purpose of this Act is to address the adverse impacts of marine debris on the U.S. economy, the marine environment, and navigation safety through identification, determination of sources, assessment, prevention, reduction, and removal. The Act also provides for the development of effective non-regulatory measures and incentives to cooperatively reduce the volume of lost and discarded fishing gear and to aid in its recovery. Section 3(b) of the Marine Debris Research, Prevention, and Reduction Act of 1952 is amended to read as follows: (1) identify sources of, assess, prevent, reduce, and remove marine debris, with a focus on marine debris posing a threat to living marine resources and navigational safety.  (2) provide national and regional coordination to assist States, Indian tribes, and regional organizations in identifying, determination, and removing marine debris; (3) provide methods for marking gear used in specific fisheries to reduce adverse impacts, including identification, recovery, and identification of sources; and (4) assist the public and other stakeholders in understanding the risks associated with marine debris.On August 1, 2012, the U.S. House of Representatives passed the Marine Debris Research, Prevention, and Reduction Act of 2012 (Act), which was signed into law on August 1, 2012 by the President of the United States. The Act seeks to reduce the amount of marine debris that enters the marine environment and the Great Lakes region. The term \"marine debris\" means any persistent solid material that is manufactured or processed, directly or indirectly, and intentionally or unintentionally, disposed of or abandoned into the environment or the Great Lake region. According to the Act's text, \"Marine debris\" is defined as \"any material that has been or is likely to be used in the production, processing, or storage of marine products, including, but not limited to, fish, shellfish, and other marine life. It is also defined as any debris that is not disposed of in a manner that is consistent with the provisions of the act. The act provides that the Secretary of the Department of the Interior and the National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration (NOAA) will determine the amount and type of debris that should be removed from the environment and disposed of. The amount of debris removed will be determined at the discretion of the Secretary and the NOAA. The Secretary is required to submit a report to Congress each year on the status of the implementation of the Act. The report will be available on the NOAA's website at: http://www.NOAA.gov/.", "summary": "Marine Debris Act Reauthorization Amendments of 2012 - Reauthorizes appropriations through FY2015 for, and revises provisions of, the Marine Debris Research, Prevention, and Reduction Act.\n\n(Sec. 3) Renames such Act as the Marine Debris Act. Replaces provisions establishing within the National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration (NOAA) the Marine Debris Prevention and Removal Program with provisions establishing the Marine Debris Program to identify, determine sources of, assess, prevent, reduce, and remove the occurrence and adverse impacts of marine debris on the U.S. economy, the marine environment, and navigation safety.\n\n(Sec. 5) Revises Program components, including by requiring the Administrator of NOAA to provide national and regional coordination to assist states, Indian tribes, and regional organizations in identification, determination of sources, assessment, prevention, reduction, and removal of marine debris.\n\nAmends the Marine Plastic Pollution Research and Control Act of 1987 to repeal the plastic pollution public education program.\n\n(Sec. 7) Replaces provisions of the Marine Debris Program concerning interagency coordination with provisions establishing the Interagency Marine Debris Coordinating Committee under the Marine Plastic Pollution Research and Control Act of 1987.\n\nRequires such Committee to submit biennial (currently annual) progress reports.\n\n(Sec. 8) Requires the Administrator to ensure the confidentiality of information submitted into the federal information clearinghouse on marine debris. (Currently, the Administrator is required to take steps to ensure the confidentiality of only such information that is submitted by the fishing industry.)\n\n(Sec. 9) Defines the term \"marine debris\" as any persistent solid material that is manufactured or processed and disposed of or abandoned into the marine environment or the Great Lakes.", "title": "To reauthorize and amend the Marine Debris Research, Prevention, and Reduction Act."}, {"text": "The United States and the Indian tribes have a unique legal and political government-to-government relationship. The U.S. has a trust obligation to provide certain services to Indian tribes and to Indians. The purpose of this Act is to ensure that Indian needs for Federal programs and services are known in a more certain and predictable fashion. The Act requires each Federal department or agency, in coordination with the Secretary of the Interior, to conduct an Indian Needs Assessment. The needs assessment shall address, but not be limited to, the following: The location of the service area of each program. The total population of members of other tribes located in that service area. The availability of similar programs within the geographical area to tribes or tribal members. The number of people living in each service area per tribe. The population of each tribe per tribe is not required to be determined. The INA shall be conducted by an appropriate entity, in consultation with the tribal governments. The contractor shall consult with tribal governments in establishing and conducting the needs assessment.The Secretary of the Interior shall develop a uniform method and criteria, and uniform procedures for compiling, maintaining, keeping current, and reporting to Congress all information concerning the annual expenditures of the department or agency for programs and services for which Indians are eligible.<n>Not later than 180 days after the date of enactment of this Act, the Secretary shall submit a report detailing the coordination of Federal program and service assistance for which Indian tribes and their members are eligible to the Committees on Appropriations and the Committee on Indian Affairs of the Senate. The Secretary shall also file a Strategic Plan for the Coordination of Federal Assistance for Indians. The Strategic Plan shall identify reforms necessary to the laws, regulations, policies, procedures, practices, and systems of the Federal departments or agencies involved. The report shall include recommendations for implementing the reforms identified in the Strategic Plan.", "summary": "Indian Needs Assessment and Program Evaluation Act of 2001 - Directs the Secretary of the Interior to contract with an appropriate entity to develop a uniform method, criteria, and procedures for determining, analyzing, and compiling the program and service assistance needs of Indian tribes and Indians nationwide.Requires Federal departments and agencies to conduct Indian Needs Assessments aimed at determining the actual needs of tribes and Indians eligible for programs and services administered by such departments and agencies.Directs the Secretary to develop a uniform method, criteria, and procedures for compiling, maintaining, keeping current, and reporting to Congress all information concerning: (1) Federal annual expenditures for programs and services for which Indians are eligible; (2) services or programs specifically for the benefit of Indians; and (3) Federal methods of delivery of services and funding.Requires Federal departments and agencies responsible for providing services or programs to or for the benefit of tribes or Indians to: (1) file Annual Indian Program Evaluations with specified congressional committees; and (2) publish annual listings in the Federal Register of all agency programs and services for which Indian tribes may be eligible.Directs the Secretary to file a Strategic Plan for the Coordination of Federal Assistance for Indians.", "title": "A bill to provide for periodic Indian needs assessments, to require Federal Indian program evaluations, and for other purposes."}], "test": [{"text": "The U.S. Attorney's Office for the Southern District of Mississippi today announced that it has filed a civil action against the City of Elizabeth, New Jersey, for violating Section 219 of the Water Resources Development Act of 1992 (106 Stat. 4835; 113 Stat. 335) by failing to comply with certain provisions of the Act. The action, filed in federal court in Atlanta, Georgia, charges the Elizabeth City Council with violating the Act's provisions relating to the elimination or control of combined sewer overflows for Jackson County, Mississippi. According to the SEC's press release, the Elizabeth Council has agreed to pay a total of $20 million for the project. The settlement is subject to final approval by the Secretary of the Department of Justice. The Elizabeth Council will be responsible for paying a portion of the cost of the project, which will be funded by the federal government. The release also notes that the Elizabeth council has agreed not to engage in any further litigation against the city of Elizabeth. The final approval of the settlement will be subject to the Secretary's approval. The SEC is continuing to monitor the situation and will take further action if necessary.The Secretary of the U.S. Department of Transportation has determined that the city of Chesapeake, Virginia has not complied with the requirements of Section 302(b) of the Water Resources Development Act of 1986 (WRDA) and Section 710(a) of WRDA. The city's failure to comply with the recommendations of the WRDA's Inland Waterways Users Board (IWRB) has resulted in the loss of more than $10 million in federal funds. The IWRB's recommendations were based on the findings of a review conducted by the IRB and the Virginia Department of Environmental Quality (VDE). The VDE's report, which is available online at www.vde.gov, recommended that the City of Chesapeake be authorized to use up to $10 million of federal funds for the construction of a bridge over the Mississippi River to connect the Chesapeake Bay with the Chesapeake River. The City's request for funds was approved by the City Council in a meeting held on June 26, 2002. The City is required to submit a report to the VDE within 30 days of the end of each fiscal year. The report is available on VDE.gov for public inspection and can be downloaded for free online.", "summary": "Amends the Water Resources Development Act of 1999 to: (1) authorize appropriations for FY 1999 through 2009 for implementation of a long-term resource monitoring program with respect to the Upper Mississippi River Environmental Management Program (currently, such funding is designated for a program for the planning, construction, and evaluation of measures for fish and wildlife habitat rehabilitation and enhancement); (2) authorize the Secretary of the Army to carry out modifications to the navigation project for the Delaware River, Pennsylvania and Delaware, if such project as modified is technically sound, environmentally (currently, economically) acceptable, and economically justified; (3) subject certain previously deauthorized water resources development projects to the seven-year limitation governing project deauthorizations under the Act, with the exception of such a project for Indian River County, Florida; (4) except from a certain schedule of the non-Federal cost of the periodic nourishment of shore protection projects constructed after December 31, 1999, those projects for which a District Engineer's Report has been completed by such date;  (5) require that the project cooperation agreement for the Comite River Diversion Project for flood control include a provision that specifies that any reduction in the non-Federal share that results from certain modifications be credited toward the share of project costs to be paid by the Amite River Basin Drainage and Water Conservation District; (6) allow the Secretary to provide additional compensation to Chesapeake City, Maryland (currently, to the City of Chesapeake, Maryland) for damage to its water supply resulting from the Chesapeake and Delaware Canal Project; (7) provide for the submission of certain reports on water resources development projects by the Secretary, notwithstanding Federal reporting termination provisions; and (8) authorize and provide for an authorization of appropriations for the existing program for the safety and operations expenses of the Federal Railroad Administration, and make available for obligation funds currently appropriated for such program.", "title": "To make technical corrections to the Water Resources Development Act of 1999."}, {"text": "The U.S. Department of the Interior's Bureau of Land Management (BLM) announced today that it will implement a new grazing fee on federal lands in the Western United States. The fee is designed to provide for cooperative agreements, private, public partnerships, and flexibility in management programs and agreements to assure sound management and stewardship of the renewable resources it is imperative to charge. According to the BLM's press release, the new fee will be in addition to the current grazing fee of $5 per acre per year. The new fee is effective immediately and will be implemented on all lands that are authorized for grazing on the federal government's lands. The BLM is required by law to charge a grazing fee for each acre of land that is leased to a private company. The grazing fee is determined annually by multiplying the average grazing fee per acre by the total number of authorized private production units on federal land. For the purpose of this section, all grazing operations conducted on any Federal lands shall be subject to all applicable Federal, State, and local laws, including but not limited to: (1) Animal Damage Control Act (ACPA), (2) Clean Air Act (CPA), (3) Federal Grant and Cooperative Agreement Act of 1977 (GCA), (4) Federal Insecticide, Fungicide, and Rodenticide Act (IFRA), and (5) National Environmental Policy Act of 1969 (NPA)The Secretary of Agriculture and the Secretary of the Interior shall calculate annually the Federal forage fee by calculating the average of the Western livestock grazing survey for the preceding three years. The fee shall not be greater than 125 percent, or less than 75 percent, of the fee calculated for the previous year pursuant to Executive Order 12548 dated February 14, 1986. For each year after the first year that the Secretaries calculate the federal forage fee, the fee shall be less than 25 percent. The nonfee cost differential shall be calculated periodically by the Secretaries so as to reflect the actual nonfee costs incurred by the cattle and sheep industry that utilize public lands in the sixteen Western States. The results of the updated survey shall be incorporated into the calculation of the Non Fee Cost Differential as they become available.", "summary": "Federal Forage Fee Act of 1993 - Subjects grazing operations on Federal land to applicable Federal, State, and local environmental and land use requirements. \nSets forth a forage fee formula for lands under the jurisdiction of the Department of Agriculture and the Department of the Interior.", "title": "Federal Forage Fee Act of 1993"}, {"text": "The U.S. Merchant Marine was integral in providing the link between domestic production and the fighting forces overseas, providing combat equipment, fuel, food, commodities, and raw materials to troops stationed overseas. Without their support, the Navy could not have accomplished its mission'', said Fleet Admiral Ernest J. King in a 1945 letter. President and former Supreme Commander of the Allied Forces, Dwight D. Eisenhower, acknowledged that through the prompt delivery of supplies and equipment to our armed forces overseas ... the American Merchant Marine has effectively helped to strengthen the forces of freedom throughout the world''. General Eisenhower stated that these goods and resources saved thousands of lives and enabled the Allied Powers to claim victory in World War II.The U.S. House of Representatives passed the National Medals of America Act of 2016 on November 30, 2016. The Act provides that all medals struck pursuant to this Act are national medals for purposes of chapter 51 of title 31, United States Code.", "summary": ".  Merchant Marine of World War II Congressional Gold Medal Act (Sec. 3) This bill requires the Speaker of the House of Representatives and the President pro tempore of the Senate to arrange for the award, on behalf of Congress, of a single gold medal to the U.S. Merchant Marine of World War II, in recognition of their dedicated and vital service during World War II.  Following its award the medal shall be given to the American Merchant Marine Museum where it will be available for display and research.", "title": "Merchant Marine of World War II Congressional Gold Medal Act"}, {"text": "The Small Business Tax Modernization Act of 2004 (SBTMA) was signed into law by President Barack Obama on February 2, 2015 and effective on January 1, 2015 .<n>The SBTMA provides for the following changes to the tax treatment of certain unincorporated pass-thru entities: (A) Election by certain unincorporated corporations to be taxed as partnership. The term partner' includes a member in such a syndicate, group, pool, joint venture, or other unincorporated organization, through or by means of which any business, financial operation, or venture is carried on, and which is not within the meaning of this title, a trust or estate or a corporation.(B) Each partner shall include in gross income as a dividend, any amount that would have been so includible had the entity been an S corporation during the period the entity was treated as a partnership.<n>(V) Notwithstanding the preceding sentence, the provisions of subchapter K of the Act apply to determine the basis of any property distributed and the basis for any interest in the partnership. Section 1379A of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, provides that no gain or loss shall be recognized to the corporation or its shareholders by reason of an election under clause (i) or (ii) of the Code, except in the case of election made by a S corporation after the end of the recognition period (as defined in section 1374(d)(5)) without regard to subparagraph (B)(5)).(v) The provisions of subsections (a) and (c) of this subparagraphs apply to the entities that are not deemed to be S corporations.The U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission today issued new guidance on the tax treatment of a corporation's distributions to its shareholders. The guidance provides that, in the case of an election under section 7701(a) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, the shareholders of the corporation will be treated as if the assets were distributed, on the date of such election, to the shareholders in exchange for their stock. The new guidance also provides that the amount of the net recognized built-in gains taken into account under section 1374(b)(1) of the Code will be reduced by the tax imposed by that section, and that the accumulated earnings and profits will be increased at the beginning of the taxable year. For purposes of the new guidance, the 10-year recognition period for the election of an S corporation as a partnership has expired, and the special rule relating to election of a partnership to be taxed as partnership has been amended. The SEC's guidance is available on its website at: http://www.sec.gov/investors/news/news-releases/sec. As a result of the changes, the effective date of the amended rules is January 1, 2015 and the new rules will apply to transactions after that date. The amended rules are subject to final approval by the SEC.The Partnership Income Attributable to Capital Act of 2004 was amended by adding at the end the following new subsection: (A) The amount, if any, in excess of what would constitute reasonable compensation for services rendered by such partner to the partnership, shall be treated as income attributable to capital. A reasonable rate of return on unreturned capital shall equal 150 percent (or such higher rate as is established in regulations) of the highest applicable Federal rate, as determined under section 1274(d)(1) at the beginning of the partnership's taxable year.(B) The term \"unreturned\" means the excess of the aggregate amount of money and the fair market value as of the date of contribution of other consideration (net of liabilities) contributed by the partner over that aggregate amount. The partner's share of all reportable items distributed by the partnership to the partner as determined in section 702. (A) If the partner acquires a partnership interest and the partnership makes an election under section 754, the Partner's Unreturned Capital shall take into account appropriate adjustments under sections 743 and 743A.", "summary": "Small Business Modernization Act of 2004 - Amends the Internal Revenue Code to: (1) terminate subchapter S corporation elections after 2004 and subchapter S status after 2014 and to allow privately-held domestic corporations, in lieu of electing subchapter S treatment, to elect to be treated as partnerships for tax purposes; (2) set forth rules for the tax treatment of former subchapter S corporations electing partnership status; and (3) exclude from net earnings from self-employment partnership income attributable to capital.", "title": "To amend the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 to provide for unified income taxation with respect to pass-thru entities."}, {"text": "The Securities and Exchange Commission today announced that it will implement a new \"safe harbor\" for covered investment fund research reports that are published or distributed by a broker or dealer. The Securities Act of 1933 and the Investment Company Act of 1940 provide for the protection of investors and for the promotion of capital formation. The new safe harbor will apply to covered investment funds with a class of securities in substantially continuous distribution, condition the safe harbor on whether the broker's or dealer's publication or distribution is subject to the rules and regulations thereunder, and provide that a self-regulatory organization may not maintain or enforce any rule that would limit the ability of a member to publish or distribute a covered fund research report solely because the member is also participating in a registered offering or other distribution of securities of such covered investment investment fund. The SEC's announcement of the new safety harbor follows the announcement by the U.S. Attorney's Office for the Southern District of New York that it has filed criminal charges against an investment adviser for violating the anti-fraud provisions of Section 17(a)(1) of the Securities Act and Section 10(b) of the Exchange Act of 1934 and Rule 10b-5 thereunder. According to the SEC announcement, the SEC is continuing its investigation of the investment adviser's conduct in connection with the alleged violations of these provisions. The announcement also provides that the SEC will consider whether there is a need for further action.The Securities and Exchange Commission today announced that it has adopted a new rule that requires covered investment fund research reports to be published and distributed by a broker or dealer after 180 days following the date of enactment of this Act. The new rule applies to covered investment funds that are listed on a national securities exchange and that are not subject to section 24(b) of the Investment Company Act of 1940. According to the SEC's new rule, the term \"covered investment fund\" means an investment company registered under, or that has filed an election to be treated as a business development company under, the Securities Act of 1933 and that provides in its registration statement that a class of its securities are purchased or redeemed, subject to conditions or limitations, for a ratable share of its assets. In addition, the new rule requires that the research report be published or distributed to the extent that it is published, distributed by, or is written or written by a person acting on behalf of, or acting as an officer or director of, an investment fund. The SEC also requires that such research reports be of sufficient quality to be deemed to satisfy the reporting history requirements (without regard to Form S-3 or Form F-3 eligibility) and minimum float provisions of such subsections for purposes of the Commission's rules and regulations under the Federal securities laws under the Securities laws and the rules of any self-regulatory organization.", "summary": "Fair Access to Investment Research Act of 2016 This bill directs the Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC) to revise a specified regulation to create a safe harbor for certain publications or distributions of research reports by brokers or dealers distributing securities. The revised regulation shall declare that a published or distributed investment fund research report shall not be deemed to constitute an offer for sale or an offer to sell a security that is the subject of the offering pursuant to an effective registration statement, even if the broker or dealer is participating or will participate in the registered offering of the covered investment fund's securities. The covered investment fund research report shall indeed be deemed to satisfy the regulation's requirements as well as those of any self-regulatory organization. The SEC shall not impose specified conditions and requirements when implementing the safe harbor.  Until the SEC has adopted such safe harbor revisions, and the Financial Industry Regulatory Authority (FINRA) has revised a related rule, a covered investment fund shall be deemed to be a security listed on a national securities exchange that is not subject to a certain filing requirement of the Investment Company Act of 1940. ", "title": "Fair Access to Investment Research Act of 2016"}, {"text": "The Prescription Drug Monitoring Program (PDMP) is a federal program established under the Controlled Substances Act of 1980 (C.S.A. Act) that provides funding to states to monitor the dispensed use of controlled substances. The purpose of the PDMP is to detect patterns indicative of controlled substance misuse, including opioid misuse, and to provide proactive notification to a practitioner when those patterns are detected. The Act provides that each covered State may withhold funding from a State that fails to comply with the program's requirements. The State may also withhold funds from an eligible entity to facilitate the sharing of data by practitioners and an inter-State data-sharing single hub. The provisions of this Act apply to all States and the District of Columbia that receive funding under the Harold Rogers Prescription Drug monitoring program. For more information about the program, see the SEC's website.The data-sharing single hub established under paragraph (1)--A shall allow States to retain ownership of the data submitted by the States; (ii) provide a source of de-identified data that can be used for statistical, research, or educational purposes; (iii) allow State authorized users to access data from a covered State without requiring a user fee; and (iv) conform with the standards of the Prescription Monitoring Information Exchange.", "summary": "Prescription Drug Monitoring Act of 2016 This bill requires a state that receives grant funds under the prescription drug monitoring program (PDMP) or the controlled substance monitoring program to comply with specified requirements. The Department of Justice (DOJ) or Department of Health and Human Services may withhold grant funds from a state that fails to comply.  Additionally, the bill requires a state to share its PDMP data with other states through a data-sharing hub established by DOJ. ", "title": "Prescription Drug Monitoring Act of 2016"}, {"text": "The purpose of this Act is to establish, maintain, and operate a Strategic Gasoline and Fuel Reserve. The Reserve is not a component of the Strategic Petroleum Reserve established under part B.<n>The Reserve shall contain not more than 40,000,000 barrels of gasoline; and (2) 7,500,000 barrels of jet fuel.<n>Not later than 1 year after the date of enactment of this act, the Secretary of the U.S. shall determine not less than 3 Reserve sites, and not over 5 Reserve sites that are regionally strategic. The Secretary shall complete the process of filling the Reserve by March 1, 2008. The President may extend the deadline established under section 192(a) of the Act.The Secretary of the U.S. Department of the Treasury is authorized to release gasoline or fuel from the Strategic Gasoline and Fuel Reserve Fund (SGF) only if the President finds that there is a severe fuel supply disruption of significant scope and duration. The release would not have an adverse effect on the long-term economic viability of retail gas or fuel markets in the State and adjacent States. The SGF is established in the Treasury of the United States a revolving fund, to be known as the Strategic gasoline and fuel reserve fund. The Secretary shall submit to Congress a plan describing the acquisition of storage and related facilities or storage services for the Reserve, including the use of storage facilities not currently in use or not currently used to capacity. The plan shall include the anticipated methods of disposition, the estimated costs of establishment, maintenance, and operation of the reserve, and actions that the Department will take to minimize any potential need for future drawdowns from the Reserve.The Secretary of the Treasury is authorized to transfer from the Fund such amounts as are necessary to carry out activities under this part, to remain available until expended. The amounts required to be transferred to the Fund under this section shall be transferred at least monthly from the general fund of the Department of the U.S.", "summary": "Strategic Gasoline and Fuel Reserve Act of 2005 - Amends the Energy Policy and Conservation Act to direct the Secretary of Energy to establish, maintain, and operate a Strategic Gasoline and Fuel Reserve of gasoline and jet fuel.\n\nInstructs the Secretary to determine between three and five regionally strategic Reserve sites throughout the United States.\n\nPermits the Secretary to release gasoline or fuel from the Reserve only if: (1) the President finds that there is a severe fuel supply disruption; or (2) the Governor of a state requests a release from the Reserve, accompanied by specified findings.\n\n\n\nEstablishes in the Treasury a revolving Strategic Gasoline and Fuel Reserve Fund.", "title": "A bill to establish a Strategic Gasoline and Fuel Reserve."}, {"text": "The U.S. Attorney's Office for the Southern District of New York today announced criminal charges against a former New York City Police Department officer in connection with the death of an officer who was injured in the line of duty. The officer's death was determined to be the direct result of a catastrophic injury sustained during the course of his duties. The criminal charges were filed under the provisions of Section 1213 of the Omnibus Crime Control and Safe Streets Act of 1968 and Section 1201(b) of the Public Safety Officer Benefits Enhancement Act of 1996. The officer died on or after January 1, 1978; or (2) becomes permanently and totally disabled as a result of his injury. The law provides that an eligible dependent of a public safety officer shall be eligible for assistance under this subpart. The term \"eligible dependent\" means any person who is described in section 1201(a), or who is eligible to receive benefits under section 120(b), including the child of such officer, or any individual who is employed by any Federal, State, county, or local agency and is authorized by law to conduct an investigation of or participate in the prosecution of a felony offense. (C) the spouse of any public safety officers described in subparagraphs (A) and (B) of sections 1204 and 1201(c) shall be entitled to a pension equal to 80 percent of the amount of the applicable amount under section 1223(a) if the officer died or on the date of his death or is permanently disabled.(A) if there is a surviving spouse and the deceased officer is not employed by a federal, state, or county agency, the Bureau is required to pay an annual pension to one or more survivors of the deceased public security officer in accordance with the law. Section 1217 of the Crime Control Act of 1968. The law is amended by adding at the end the following new paragraphs: (4) The term eligible dependent'' means any individual, such as a child, who is or is a member of a family member of the United States Department of Justice, or a state or local law enforcement agency, and who is entitled to benefits under sections 1201(d), 1201(e) or 1201(f) under Section 120(c)The Securities and Exchange Commission today issued a new rule that provides for a deceased public safety officer's children to receive a pension equal to 20 percent of the amount of their father's life insurance policy. Section 1223 of the Securities Act of 1933 and Rule 1223(a) of the Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, provide for the payment of a pension to the surviving child of an officer who dies in the line of duty while serving as an officer of the public safety agency, organization, or unit. The new rule applies only to the children of officers who are deceased at the time of their death. For example, if there is no surviving spouse or surviving child, but there is one surviving parent of such officer, the officer designates the surviving parent as the beneficiary under his most recently executed death insurance policy on file with the agency or organization. The surviving parent's pension will be paid to that parent in equal shares. The amount of the annual pension or share of pension under this rule shall be paid for the lifetime of the beneficiary, without regard to the marital status or any other status of the benefit recipient. The annual base salary of the officer is the greater of the following: (1) The annual percentage change in the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers, published by the Bureau of Labor Statistics, occurring in the 1-year period ending on June 1 immediately preceding such October 1;  (2) The annual cost of living adjustment for each fiscal year beginning after the effective date of this subpart, adjusted in accordance with subsections (a) and (b) of section 1204 of the SEC's Rules 1223 and 1223A. The Secretary of Education is authorized to award a Public Safety Officer scholarship to an eligible applicant who is attending, or has been accepted for enrollment, as a full-time or part-time student in any eligible institution providing instruction for one or more postsecondary degrees, for the purposes of this term. The application shall be accompanied by a certification from the head of the Public Safety Office certifying that such officer is a deceased or disabled officer, as defined in paragraph (3) of section 305.The Secretary of the U.S. Department of Education is authorized to award scholarships to students enrolled in kindergarten, elementary school, or secondary school. The maximum amount of a scholarship award under this title shall not exceed the lesser of the following: (A) The average per pupil expenditure for elementary and secondary education of the local educational agency for the geographic area in which the eligible applicant resides. (B) The actual cost to the student for attendance at the school, including expenses such as tuition, fees, books, transportation costs, and other related expenses, as determined by the Secretary. (C) The award period for each scholarship award is the period of time normally required for the completion of a high school diploma by a student in the grade that the recipient is in at the time the award commences. The Secretary is authorized, if practicable, to use eligible institutions as fiscal agents for the payment of scholarship awards.The term \"public safety officer\" means a public safety officer with respect to whom the Bureau of Justice Assistance has determined, in accordance with section 1201 of the Omnibus Crime Control and Safe Streets Act of 1968 (42 U.S.C. 3796), that such officer has died as the direct and proximate result of a personal injury sustained in the line of duty.<n>The term \"dependent child\" means the child of a deceased or disabled officer, including a stepchild or an adopted child, who is living with or receiving regular support contributions from such officer at the time of the officer's death or when the officer is permanently and totally disabled.<n>An eligible applicant means a person residing in a State who is any of the following: (A) A public security officer described in paragraph A. of title 5, United States Code, is amended by striking or remarries before reaching age 55'' in section 8133(b)(1) of this title. (C) A dependent child means any person who is a member of an eligible institution of higher education, as defined in section 7801 of the Elementary and Secondary Education Act of 1965 (ESEA) or any institution in the State of Washington, the District of Columbia, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, or the United States.", "summary": "Special Agent Scott K. Carey Public Safety Officer Benefits Enhancement Act - Amends the Omnibus Crime Control and Safe Streets Act of 1968 to extend: (1) educational benefits to public safety officers who become permanently and totally disabled in the line of duty and to their spouses and children; (2) allow payment of retroactive benefits to dependents of such disabled officers; and (3) establish a program of pension payments for certain survivors of deceased public safety officers.\n\nAuthorizes the Secretary of Education to: (1) award a Public Safety Officer scholarship to disabled public safety officers, their spouses, and their children; and (2) enter into agreements with educational institutions to carry out such scholarship program.\n\nAmends federal personnel law to allow widows or widowers of federal employees killed on the job to continue to receive monthly compensation even if they remarry before reaching age 55.", "title": "To provide increased benefits for public safety officers disabled in the line of duty, and for the spouses and children of public safety officers killed or disabled in the line of duty, and for other purposes."}, {"text": "The Economic Literacy and Economic Opportunity Act of 2015 provides a tax credit for programs that promote economic and financial literacy. The credit is limited to 50 percent of the amount paid or incurred during the taxable year to carry out the purposes specified in section 5533(b) of the Elementary and Secondary Education Act of 1965 (20 U.S.C. 7267b) pursuant to a qualified program. The Secretary of Education shall determine which for profit organizations are allowed the credit under this section for a taxable year in such manner as the Secretary determines appropriate. The majority of recipients must be owned by veterans, or meet an asset test.<n>In making determinations under this paragraph, the Secretary shall give priority to taxpayers that have qualified programs which serve either urban or rural underserved areas (determined on the basis of the most recent United States census data available) or those that are socially and economically disadvantaged small businesses.The Internal Revenue Code of 1986 amended to provide for a new tax credit for education expenses. The new credit is based on the same method used by the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System to determine a bank holding company's consolidated assets under section 165 of the Financial Stability Act of 2010 (12 U.S.C. 5365). The credit is not available to taxpayers for any taxable year if they elect to have this section not apply for such taxable year. The amount of any deduction or credit otherwise allowable under this chapter for any amount taken into account for purposes of subsection (a) shall be reduced by the credit allowed by this section. The Secretary shall issue such regulations or other guidance as may be necessary or appropriate to carry out this Section.", "summary": "Promoting Financial Literacy and Economic Opportunity Act of 2015 This bill amends the Internal Revenue Code to allow up to 20 for-profit organizations in any taxable year a business-related tax credit for 50% of the amount paid or incurred to carry out activities to improve the quality of student understanding of personal finance and economics. The Department of the Treasury shall determine which for-profit organizations are eligible for the credit, ensuring that a majority of credit recipients are: (1) either a socially and economically disadvantaged small business concern, a small business concern owned and controlled by women, or a small business concern that is at least 51% owned by veterans, or (2) do not have more than $60 billion in assets. In determining the eligibility of a for-profit organization, Treasury shall give priority to organizations that have programs serving either urban or rural underserved areas. ", "title": "Promoting Financial Literacy and Economic Opportunity Act of 2015"}, {"text": "The term \"delivery sale\" means any sale of cigarettes or a smokeless tobacco product to a consumer if the consumer submits the order for such sale by means of a telephone or other method of voice transmission, the mail, or the Internet or other online service.<n>The term \"Indian tribe\" and \"tribal\" refer to an Indian tribe as defined in the Indian Self- Determination and Education Assistance Act of 1994 (25 U.S.C. 450b(e) or as listed pursuant to section 104 of the Federally recognized Indian Tribe List Act of 1994).<n>A State, acting through its attorney general, or a local government, may bring an action in the United States district courts against any person, other than a State, local, or tribal government, to prevent and restrain violations of this title.<n>Nothing in this subsection shall be deemed to restrict any sovereign immunity of a State or local government or Indian tribe against any unconsented lawsuit under this title or to otherwise restrict any such immunity.The U.S. Attorney's Office for the Southern District of New York announced today that it has filed criminal charges against the owner of an e-cigarette store in Brooklyn, New York, for violating the federal anti-smoking laws. The charges, filed in federal court in Manhattan, charge the owner with violating Section 10(b) of the Federal Cigarette Labeling and Advertising Act of 1986 and Section 3 of the Comprehensive Smokeless Tobacco Health Education Act of 1986, as amended by Section 1333(c) of that Act. Without admitting or denying the charges, the owner has agreed to the entry of a final judgment that permanently enjoins him from violating the provisions of these laws and orders him to pay a civil penalty. The final judgment, which is subject to court approval, also orders the owner to pay the full amount of the civil penalty, plus interest, if any. The attorney's office is continuing to investigate the case and has not yet determined whether the owner will be charged. The case is being handled by the Office of the Chief Counsel for the Federal Bureau of Investigation in New York City. The court's final judgment is not subject to public disclosure.A person who relands or receives tobacco products in the quantity allowed entry free of tax and duty under chapter 98 of the Harmonized Tariff Schedule of the United States may voluntarily relinquish such products to the Secretary of the U.S. at the time of entry any excess of such quantity without incurring the penalty under subsection (c) of the law.<n>The term \"delivery sale\" means any sale of a tobacco product to a consumer by means of a telephone or other method of voice transmission, the mail, or the Internet or other online service. The seller is not in the physical presence of the buyer when the request for purchase or order is made or the tobacco product is delivered by use of a common carrier, private delivery service or the mail.", "summary": "Amends the Tariff Act of 1930 to define \"delivery sale\" of a tobacco product as any sale of cigarettes or a smokeless tobacco product to a consumer if: (1) the consumer submits the purchase order by means of a telephone or other method of voice transmission, the mail, or the Internet or other online service, or the seller is otherwise not in the buyer's physical presence when the purchase request or order is made; or (2) the cigarettes or smokeless tobacco product is delivered by use of a common carrier, private delivery service, or the mail, or the seller is not in the buyer's physical presence when the buyer obtains personal possession of the delivered cigarettes or smokeless tobacco product.\n\n\n\nMakes the personal use exemption from tobacco import requirements inapplicable to cigarettes or smokeless tobacco products sold in connection with a delivery sale.\n\nAllows states access to copies of Customs Service certifications required for cigarette imports.\n\nPermits any tobacco product, cigarette papers, or tube found in violation of the Act to be forfeited for destruction to any state in which it is found.\n\nAuthorizes persons who hold permits under the Internal Revenue Code concerning tobacco products, cigarette papers, and tubes to bring an action in the U.S. district courts against any person, other than a state, local, or tribal government, to prevent and restrain violations of the Act.\n\nAuthorizes state and local governments to bring civil actions for prevention or restraint against persons who violate the Act.\n\nSubjects smokeless tobacco products to the same entry requirements and enforcement mechanisms as apply to certain cigarettes under the Act.\n\nAmends the Internal Revenue Code to impose civil penalties against persons for relanding, except for personal use, tobacco products sold in a delivery sale.", "title": "To amend the Tariff Act of 1930 and the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 relating to importation of tobacco products."}], "ca_test": [{"text": "The State Board of Equalization has determined that only parts of American Legion halls are exempt from property taxation and that other parts, such as billiard rooms, card rooms, and similar areas, are not exempt. Section 501(c) of the Internal Revenue Code and related federal regulations provide for the exemption for posts or organizations of war veterans, or an auxiliary unit or society of, or a trust or foundation for, any such post or organization that carries on programs to perpetuate the memory of deceased veterans and members of the Armed Forces. Section 215.1 of the Revenue and Taxation Code stipulates that all buildings, and so much of the real property on which the buildings are situated as may be required for the convenient use and occupation of the buildings, used exclusively for charitable purposes, owned by a veterans\u2019 organization that has been chartered by the Congress of the United States. Section  215.1 further states that programs for religious, charitable, scientific, literary, or educational purposes require the use of facilities for funerals and receptions for more than 50 attendees. In a 1979 appellate court decision, the Chief Counsel of the State Equalization concluded that only the office areas used to counsel veterans and the area used to store veterans\u2019 records were exempt from taxation. The legal division further concluded that the meeting hall and bar found in most of the facilities are not considered used for charity purposes. The Equalization's opinion reflects a lack of understanding of the purpose and programs of the veterans service organizations posts or halls and the good works performed in support of our veteran community.The Legislature has determined that the use of real property by a veterans' organization as described in subdivision (a) for fraternal, lodge, or social club purposes is central to that organization's exempt purposes and activities. The exemption provided for in this section shall not apply to any portion of a property that consists of a bar where alcoholic beverages are served. An organization that files a claim for the exemption shall file with the assessor a valid organizational clearance certificate issued pursuant to Section 254.6. The state shall not reimburse any local agency for any property tax revenues lost by it pursuant to this act.", "summary": "Existing property tax law establishes a veterans\u2019 organization exemption under which property is exempt from taxation if, among other things, that property is used exclusively for charitable purposes and is owned by a veterans\u2019 organization.\nThis bill would provide that the veterans\u2019 organization exemption shall not be denied to a property on the basis that the property is used for fraternal, lodge, or social club purposes, and would make specific findings and declarations in that regard. The bill would also provide that the exemption shall not apply to any portion of a property that consists of a bar where alcoholic beverages are served.\nSection 2229 of the Revenue and Taxation Code requires the Legislature to reimburse local agencies annually for certain property tax revenues lost as a result of any exemption or classification of property for purposes of ad valorem property taxation.\nThis bill would provide that, notwithstanding Section 2229 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, no appropriation is made and the state shall not reimburse local agencies for property tax revenues lost by them pursuant to the bill.\nThis bill would take effect immediately as a tax levy.", "title": "An act to amend Section 215.1 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, relating to taxation, to take effect immediately, tax levy."}, {"text": "A prisoner is not eligible for resentence or recall pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 1170 if he or she was convicted of first-degree murder if the victim was a peace officer, or was intentionally killed in retaliation for the performance of his or her official duties.<n>A prisoner is granted medical parole if the head physician of an institution determines, as provided in subdivision (b), that the prisoner is permanently medically incapacitated with a medical condition that renders him or her permanently unable to perform activities of basic daily living, and results in the prisoner requiring 24-hour care.<n>The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall complete parole plans for inmates referred to the Board of Parole Hearings for medical parole consideration. The parole plans shall include, but not be limited to, the inmate\u2019s plan for residency and medical care.In the event of a tie vote, the matter shall be referred to the full board for a decision. Medical parole hearings may be heard in absentia. The board shall make an independent judgment regarding whether the conditions under which the inmate would be released pose a reasonable threat to public safety.<n>The board or the Division of Adult Parole Operations shall have the authority to impose any reasonable conditions on prisoners subject to medical parole supervision pursuant to subdivision (a), including, but not limited to, the requirement that the parolee submit to electronic monitoring.<n>If the board determines, based on a medical examination and diagnosis, that the person\u2019s medical condition has improved to the extent that they no longer qualify for medical parole, the board shall return the person to the custody of the department.", "summary": "Existing law provides that the Board of Parole Hearings or its successor in interest shall be the state\u2019s parole authority. Existing law requires that a prisoner who is found to be permanently medically incapacitated, as specified, be granted medical parole, if the Board of Parole Hearings determines that the conditions under which the prisoner would be released would not reasonably pose a threat to public safety. Existing law exempts a prisoner sentenced to death, a prisoner sentenced to life without the possibility of parole, and a prisoner who is serving a sentence for which parole is prohibited by initiative statute, from medical parole eligibility.\nExisting law authorizes a court to resentence or recall the sentence of a prisoner if the court finds that the prisoner is terminally ill, as specified, or the prisoner is permanently medically incapacitated, as specified, and, in either case, the conditions under which the prisoner would be released or receive treatment do not pose a threat to public safety. Existing law exempts a prisoner sentenced to death or a term of life without the possibility of parole from eligibility for compassionate release pursuant to these provisions.\nThis bill would additionally exempt from medical parole eligibility and compassionate release eligibility a prisoner who was convicted of the first-degree murder of a peace officer or a person who had been a peace officer, as provided.", "title": "An act to amend Section 3550 of, and to add Section 1170.02 to, the Penal Code, relating to parole."}, {"text": "A new report from the California Legislature finds that while the state has one of the most progressive tax structures in the nation, for too many of its residents the future is receding. According to the report, the state's two trillion dollar economy has shifted from being mainly agricultural and manufacturing in the 1950s and 1960s to one based on information and services, which now accounts for 80 percent of all economic activities in the state. To achieve a future as promising as California's past, we need a tax system that is based on this real economy of the 21st century while ensuring that new revenue is invested in strengthening the ladder of mobility for all our residents. The lack of investment in infrastructure and education has diminished opportunities for Californians and continues to fuel the growing income inequality in California. Since 1970, the poorest 20 percent of Californians have seen their household income grow by just 3.1 percent while the income of the richest 20 percent has climbed 74.6 percent.The Upward Mobility Act would help ensure California's residents and businesses can thrive in the 21st century global economy by increasing funding by $10 billion dollars for the following programs.<n> Investing in its residents through education is the foundation on which California has always built its economy. The measure would provide new funds to help rebuild California\u2019s education system at every level. The bill would also establish a refundable earned income tax credit to help low-income families offset the burden of the proposed sales and use tax on services. It would also enhance the state\u2019s business climate, create jobs, and incentivize entrepreneurship by evaluating the current corporate income tax and linking changes to a more reasonable minimum wage.The Upward Mobility Act seeks to make three broad changes to the state's tax code, including imposing a sales tax on services to increase revenues. The measure's goal is to reduce the income tax rates imposed under the Personal Income Tax for low-and middle-class-income households so that families earning $100,000 pay only $1,000. The obligation of top earners with regard to other tax obligations for top earners, including Proposition 63, would remain intact. The bill's revenue reduction provisions would be phased in only when it is clear that new revenues are sufficient to replace any revisions to the personal income tax and corporate tax. As the revenues secured by Proposition 30 expire, California policy decisionmakers must determine new long term ways to provide for state residents.", "summary": "The Sales and Use Tax Law imposes a tax on retailers measured by the gross receipts from the sale of tangible personal property sold at retail in this state, or on the storage, use, or other consumption in this state of tangible personal property purchased from a retailer for storage, use, or other consumption in this state. The Personal Income Tax Law imposes taxes on personal taxable income at specified rates, and the Corporation Tax Law imposes taxes upon, or measured by, corporate income.\nThis bill would state legislative findings regarding the Upward Mobility Act, key provisions of which would expand the application of the Sales and Use Tax law by imposing a tax on specified services, would enhance the state\u2019s business climate\nand\n,\nwould incentivize entrepreneurship and business creation by evaluating the\nCorporate Tax Law,\ncorporate tax,\nand would examine the impacts of a lower and simpler\nPersonal Income Tax Law.\npersonal income tax.\nThis bill would, on and after January 1, ___, expand the Sales and Use Tax Law to impose a tax on the gross receipts from the sale in this state of, or the receipt of the benefit in this state of services at a rate of ____%.", "title": "An act\nto add Chapter 3.8 (commencing with Section 6305) to Part 1 of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code,\nrelating to taxation."}, {"text": "The Transit and Intercity Rail Capital Program is designed to fund transformative capital improvements that will modernize California\u2019s intercity, commuter, and urban rail systems and bus and ferry transit systems to achieve all of the following policy objectives: (1) Reduce emissions of greenhouse gases. (2) expand and improve transit service to increase ridership. (3) Integrate the rail service of the state\u2019s various rail operators, including integration with the high-speed rail system. (4) Improve transit safety.The California Department of Transportation's (DDOT's) Greenhouse Gas Reduction Fund (GGRF) is designed to provide funding for projects that reduce the state's greenhouse gas emissions. The GGRF was created pursuant to Section 15(a) of the Public Resources Code, and is intended to be used to offset or reduce the emissions of CO2 from transportation projects. To apply for funding, an eligible applicant must submit an application describing the project's purpose, intended scope, proposed cost, intended funding sources, and schedule for project completion. The application must identify the sources and timing of all moneys required to undertake and complete any phase of a project for which an applicant is seeking an allocation of moneys from the program. An eligible applicant may use a project study report or equivalent document to demonstrate eligibility for inclusion in the multiyear program of projects. The report or document shall, at a minimum, be adequate to define and justify the project scope, cost, and schedules for the project application. The Transportation Agency shall conduct at least two public workshops on draft program guidelines containing selection criteria prior to approval and shall post the draft guidelines on the agency's Internet Web site at least 30 days prior to the first public workshop.The timing and final amount of reimbursement is dependent on the terms and availability of moneys in the Greenhouse Gas Reduction Fund for the program. The commission, in consultation with intercity, commuter, urban rail, and other public transit entities, may develop guidelines to implement this section.", "summary": "Existing law requires all moneys, except for fines and penalties, collected by the State Air Resources Board from a market-based compliance mechanism relative to reduction of greenhouse gas emissions to be deposited in the Greenhouse Gas Reduction Fund.\nExisting law establishes the Transit and Intercity Rail Capital Program, which receives 10% of the annual proceeds of the Greenhouse Gas Reduction Fund as a continuous appropriation, to fund capital improvements and operational investments to modernize California\u2019s rail systems to achieve certain policy objectives, including reducing greenhouse gas emissions, expanding and improving rail services to increase ridership, and improving rail safety. Existing law requires the Transportation Agency to evaluate applications for funding under the program and to prepare a list of projects recommended for funding, with grants to be awarded by the California Transportation Commission.\nThis bill would modify the purpose of the program to delete references to operational investments and instead provide for the funding of transformative capital improvements, as defined, that will modernize California\u2019s intercity, commuter, and urban rail systems and bus and ferry transit systems to achieve certain policy objectives, including reducing emissions of greenhouse gases, expanding and improving transit services to increase ridership, and improving transit safety. By expanding the purposes for which continuously appropriated moneys may be used, the bill would make an appropriation. The bill would modify the information required to be included in applications for grants under the program and would authorize an eligible applicant to submit an application to fund a project over multiple fiscal years and to submit multiple applications. The bill would require the Transportation Agency, in selecting projects for funding, to consider the extent to which a project reduces greenhouse gas emissions, would add additional factors to be considered in evaluating applications for funding, and would expand certain factors considered to include bus and ferry transit service. The bill would require the Transportation Agency to approve, by July 1, 2018, a 5-year program of projects, and would require the California Transportation Commission to allocate funding to eligible applicants pursuant to the program of projects, with subsequent programs of projects to be approved not later than April 1 of each even-numbered year thereafter. The bill would require the Transportation Agency, in cooperation with the California Transportation Commission and at the request of an eligible applicant, to enter into and execute a multiyear funding agreement for a project to be funded over more than one fiscal year, as specified, and would authorize the California Transportation Commission to approve a letter of no prejudice that would allow an applicant to expend its own moneys on a project in the approved program of projects, subject to future reimbursement from program moneys for eligible expenditures.", "title": "An act to amend Sections 75220, 75221, and 75222 of, and to add Sections 75223, 75224, and 75225 to, the Public Resources Code, relating to transportation, and making an appropriation therefor."}, {"text": "The California Emergency Medical Services Authority has established a pilot project to operate an electronic registry system on a pilot basis, to be known as the California POLST eRegistry Pilot. The purpose of the pilot is to collect a patient\u2019s Physician Orders for Life Sustaining Treatment (POLST) information received from a physician or physician\u2019s designee and disseminating the information to an authorized user. The authority shall implement this section only after determining that sufficient nonstate funds are available to allow for the development of the system, any related startup costs, and an evaluation of the program. The pilot will be operated by, and as a part of, the health information exchange networks or by an independent contractor, or by a combination thereof. The use of the electronic registry will be limited to a single geographic area or multiple geographic areas, and will include a method for electronic delivery of this information and the use of legally sufficient electronic signatures. The information will be available to authorized users in a manner that is consistent with the privacy and security requirements of the federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 (Health Portability Act) and the California Health Information Technology Act of 2000 (California Health Information Act). The authority is required to submit a detailed plan to the Legislature explaining how the system will operate prior to implementation. The plan will be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.A physician or physician\u2019s designee who completes POLST information with a patient or his or her legally recognized health care decisionmaker shall submit a copy of the information in the patient\u2019s official medical record.<n>A health care provider, as defined in Section 4781, who honors a patient's request regarding resuscitative measures obtained from the eRegistry Pilot shall not be subject to criminal prosecution, civil liability, discipline for unprofessional conduct, administrative sanction, or any other sanction.<n>An independent contractor approved by the authority shall perform an evaluation of the electronic medical record system.", "summary": "Existing law defines a request regarding resuscitative measures as a written document, signed by an individual with capacity, or a legally recognized health care decisionmaker, and the individual\u2019s physician, directing a health care provider regarding resuscitative measures. Existing law defines a Physician Orders for Life Sustaining Treatment form, which is commonly referred to as a POLST form, and provides that a request regarding resuscitative measures includes a POLST form. Existing law requires that a POLST form and the medical intervention and procedures offered by the form be explained by a health care provider. Existing law distinguishes a request regarding resuscitative measures from an advance health care directive.\nThis bill would enact the California POLST eRegistry Pilot Act. The bill would require the Emergency Medical Services Authority to establish a pilot project, in consultation with stakeholders, to operate an electronic registry system on a pilot basis, to be known as the California POLST eRegistry Pilot, for the purpose of collecting POLST information received from a physician or physician\u2019s designee. The bill would require the authority to coordinate the POLST eRegistry Pilot, which would be operated by health information exchange networks, by an independent contractor, or by a combination thereof. The bill would require the authority to implement these provisions only after it determines that sufficient nonstate funds are available for development of the POLST eRegistry Pilot, any related startup costs, and an evaluation of the POLST eRegistry Pilot. When the POLST eRegistry Pilot is operable in the geographic area in which he or she operates or practices, a physician or physician\u2019s designee who completes POLST information would be required to include the POLST information in the patient\u2019s official medical record and would be required to submit a copy of the form to, or to enter the information into, the POLST eRegistry Pilot, unless a patient or his or her health care decisionmaker chooses not to participate in the POLST eRegistry Pilot. The bill would require the authority to adopt guidelines for, among other things, the operation of the POLST eRegistry Pilot, including the means by which POLST information would be submitted electronically, modified, or withdrawn, the appropriate and timely methods for dissemination of POLST form information, the procedures for verifying the identity of an authorized user, and rules for maintaining the confidentiality of POLST information received by the POLST eRegistry Pilot. The bill would require that any disclosure of POLST information in the POLST eRegistry Pilot be made in accordance with applicable state and federal privacy and security laws and regulations. The bill would provide immunity from criminal prosecution, civil liability, discipline for unprofessional conduct, and any other sanction for a health care provider who honors a patient\u2019s request regarding resuscitative measures obtained from the POLST eRegistry Pilot, as specified. The bill would require an independent contractor approved by the authority to conduct an evaluation of the POLST eRegistry Pilot. The provisions of the bill would be operative until January 1, 2020.", "title": "An act to add and repeal Section 4788 of the Probate Code, relating to resuscitative measures."}, {"text": "The U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission today announced changes to the reporting requirements under Section 10(b) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (Exchange Act) and Rule 10b-5 thereunder. The changes, which took effect on January 1, 2015, require certain public companies to disclose certain financial information to the SEC. The SEC's new reporting requirements apply to public companies that are not publicly traded. For example, if a public company is publicly traded, it is required to disclose the name, address, and general description of the business activity of that publicly traded company. In addition, public companies must disclose the amount and date on which a gift is received and the travel destination for purposes of a gift that is a travel payment, advance, or reimbursement. In the case of a loan, the annual interest rate, the security, if any, given for the loan, and the term of the loan are also required to be disclosed. The amended reporting requirements are as follows: (1) The name of every person from whom the business entity received payments if the filer\u2019s pro rata share of gross receipts from that person was equal to or greater than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) during a calendar year. (2) The name and address of each source of income aggregating one thousand dollars or more in value, or fifty dollars ($50) or more, if the income was a gift. (3) A statement indicating which of the following represents the aggregate value of income from each source, or the highest amount owed to each source.The U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission today issued new guidance on the reporting of political contributions to state and local elected officials. The SEC's guidance, which is effective immediately, applies to payments, advances, or reimbursements for travel, including actual transportation and related lodging, that are reasonably related to a legislative or governmental purpose, or to an issue of state, national, or international public policy. For purposes of this section, a gift of travel does not include any of the following: (1) Travel that is paid for from campaign funds, as permitted by Section 4 (commencing with Section 89510), or that is a contribution. (2) The travel is provided by a government agency, a foreign government, a bona fide public or private educational institution, as defined in Section 203 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, a nonprofit organization that is exempt from taxation under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, or by a person domiciled outside the United States who substantially satisfies the requirements for tax-exempt status. (3) The travel that is reasonably necessary in connection with bona fide business, trade, or profession and that is excluded from the criteria for federal income tax deduction for business expenses in Sections 162 and 274 of the IRS Code, unless the sole or predominant activity of the business is making speeches. (4) The guidance does not apply to payments for travel that are not reported on the recipient\u2019s statement of economic interests.The gift shall be subject to the limitations on gifts specified in Section 89503.<n>No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction. The Legislature finds and declares that this bill furthers the purposes of the Political Reform Act of 1974 within the meaning of Section 81012 of the Government Code.", "summary": "The Political Reform Act of 1974 provides for the comprehensive regulation of campaign financing and related matters, including the reporting of gifts, as defined. The act prohibits specified officers from receiving gifts in excess of $440 in value from a single source in a calendar year. The act exempts gift payments for the actual costs of specified types of travel that are reasonably related to a legislative or governmental purpose, or to an issue of state, national, or international public policy, from the annual limit on the value of gifts from a single source.\nThis bill would require a nonprofit organization that regularly organizes and hosts travel for elected officials, as specified, and that pays for these types of travel for an elected state officer or local elected officeholder to disclose the names of donors who, in the preceding year, both donated to the nonprofit organization and accompanied an elected officer or officeholder for any portion of the travel, as specified. The bill would require a person who receives a gift of a travel payment from any source to report the travel destination on his or her statement of economic interests.\nThis bill would incorporate additional changes to Section 87207 of the Government Code proposed by both this bill and AB 10, which would become operative only if both bills are enacted and become effective on or before January 1, 2016, and this bill is chaptered last.\nA violation of the act\u2019s provisions is punishable as a misdemeanor. By expanding the scope of an existing crime, this bill would impose a state-mandated local program.\nThe California Constitution requires the state to reimburse local agencies and school districts for certain costs mandated by the state. Statutory provisions establish procedures for making that reimbursement.\nThis bill would provide that no reimbursement is required by this act for a specified reason.\nThe Political Reform Act of 1974, an initiative measure, provides that the Legislature may amend the act to further the act\u2019s purposes upon a\n2/3\nvote of each house and compliance with specified procedural requirements.\nThis bill would declare that it furthers the purposes of the act.", "title": "An act to amend Sections 87207 and 89506 of the Government Code, relating to the Political Reform Act of 1974."}, {"text": "The Song-Brown Health Care Workforce Training Act of 2016 (Song-Brown Act) was signed into law by California Gov. Jerry Brown on June 10, 2016. The Act provides funding for the training of medical students in the state's primary care residency programs. The Act's purpose is to increase the number of primary care providers serving California's underserved populations. As of 2010, California needed an estimated 8,243 primary care physicians by 2030, which is about 412 new primary care physician per year. In California, only 368 slots are available each year to medical students seeking to train in family medicine. Without the funding, 158 of those slots will be lost, creating a terrible deficit of physicians in California\u2019s underserved communities. The law provides for the funding of new and existing medical residency positions, and supporting training faculty. The funds will be used to support the medical practice areas of family medicine, general surgery, internal medicine, obstetrics and gynecology, psychiatry, and related specialties and subspecialties.The purpose of this article is to establish and fund medical residency positions in areas of the state designated as a health professional shortage area for primary care by the U.S. Department of Health and Human Services. The panel shall solicit and accept funds from business, industry, foundations, and other private or public sources for the purpose of establishing and funding new residency positions. The members of the panel appointed by the Governor, the Speaker of the Assembly, the Senate Committee on Rules, and the Osteopathic Medical Board of California shall serve without compensation, but shall be reimbursed for any actual and necessary expenses incurred in connection with their duties as members.<n>The panel shall only approve and recommend to the foundation proposals that would establish residency positions that will serve in any of the following medical service areas: (1) A service area designated by either population or geographic designation, by either the Health Resources and Services Administration of the United States and the California Department of Public Health; (2) a service area that is designated as medically underserved area or medically underserved population by the federal government; and (3) a medical service area in which there is a physician shortage. The recommendation shall include all pertinent information required to enter into the necessary contracts to establish the positions.The purpose of this article is to establish a fund to provide funding for new medical residency positions throughout the state. The office will solicit proposals from public and private sector institutions, including hospitals, colleges, universities, community clinics, and other health agencies and organizations, in order to fund and establish residency positions at, or in association with, these institutions. The funds will also be used to pay for the cost of administering the goals of the panel and the foundation as established by this article, and for any other purpose authorized by this law.<n>The office will submit an annual report to the panel, the foundation, and the Legislature documenting the amount of money contributed to the fund and the purposes of those expenditures, the number and location of residency positions established, and recommendations for the location of future residency positions.The New Jersey Legislature today ruled that the state's public disclosure laws do not apply to donations made by individual donors to fund medical residency positions in underserved areas of the state. The Legislature's decision was based on a constitutional provision that protects individual donors' privacy.", "summary": "The Song-Brown Health Care Workforce Training Act creates a state medical contract program to increase the number of students and residents receiving quality education and training in specified primary care specialties or in nursing, and to maximize the delivery of primary care and family physician services to specific areas of California where there is a recognized unmet priority need for those services. The act requires the Director of Statewide Health Planning and Development to, among other things, contract with accredited medical schools, teaching health centers, training programs, hospitals, and other health care delivery systems for those purposes, based on recommendations of the California Healthcare Workforce Policy Commission and in conformity with the contract criteria and program standards established by the commission.\nThis bill would appropriate $300,000,000 from the General Fund to the director for the purpose of funding new and existing graduate medical education physician residency positions, and supporting training faculty, pursuant to the act, for expenditure as specified. The bill would also make related findings and declarations.\nExisting law, the Song-Brown Health Care Workforce Training Act, declares the intent of the Legislature to increase the number of students and residents receiving quality education and training in the specialty of family practice and as primary care physician\u2019s assistants and primary care nurse practitioners. Existing law establishes, for this purpose, a state medical contract program with accredited medical schools, programs that train primary care physician\u2019s assistants, programs that train primary care nurse practitioners, registered nurses, hospitals, and other health care delivery systems.\nExisting law requires the Office of Statewide Health Planning and Development to establish the Health Professions Education Foundation to solicit and receive funds for the purpose of providing financial assistance in the form of scholarships or loans to medical students from underrepresented groups. Under existing law, the foundation also administers other programs for the advancement of health professions, including the Registered Nurse Education Program.\nThis bill would establish the Medical Residency Training Advisory Panel, consisting of a total of 13 members to be appointed as specified, within the Health Professions Education Foundation.\nThe bill would create the Medical Residency Training Fund in the State Treasury, a continuously appropriated fund, and would require the panel to solicit and accept funds from business, industry, foundations, and other private or public sources for the purpose of establishing and funding new graduate medical residency training programs in specified areas of the state, including medically underserved areas. By creating a continuously appropriated fund, the bill would make an appropriation. The bill would require the foundation to provide technical support and financial management for the panel and to approve and send panel recommendations for new residency programs to the Office of Statewide Health Planning and Development for implementation if specified requirements are met, including sufficient funding. The bill would require the office to enter into contracts with public and private sector institutions and other health agencies and organizations in order to fund and establish recommended residency positions. The bill would authorize the Governor to include in the annual budget proposal an amount, as he or she deems reasonable, to be appropriated for this purpose. The bill, if the Legislature appropriates money for this purpose, would require the office to hold the funds and distribute them into the fund, upon request of the panel, in an amount matching the amount deposited into the fund, as specified. The bill would require money that was appropriated, but that has not been distributed to the fund at the end of each fiscal year, to be returned to the General Fund.\nExisting constitutional provisions require that a statute that limits the right of access to the meetings of public bodies or the writings of public officials and agencies be adopted with findings demonstrating the interest protected by the limitation and the need for protecting that interest.\nThis bill would make legislative findings to that effect.", "title": "An act\nto add Article 7 (commencing with Section 128590) to Chapter 5 of Part 3 of Division 107 of the Health and Safety Code,\nrelating to health care, and making an appropriation therefor."}, {"text": "The California Legislature has amended the state's Aid to Families with Dependent Children (AFDC) program to limit the length of time a family can receive basic needs assistance and the amount of assistance a family could receive. Prior to the implementation of the AFDC program, there was no limit on the duration of a family's aid, no work requirements, and the benefits provided were approximately 80 percent of the federal poverty level. Section 11270.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code of California, effective January 1, 2016, requires an applicant for, or recipient of, aid under this chapter to do as a condition of eligibility, to do any of the following: (a) Divulge that any member of the assistance unit is a victim of rape or incest. (b) Use contraception, choose a particular method of contraception, or divulge the method of birth control used. (c) For purposes of determining the maximum aid payment specified in this section, the number of needy persons in the same family shall not be increased for any child born into the applicant\u2019s or recipient\u2019s family during the 10 months prior to the birth of the child. (d) This section shall not apply to any child who was conceived as a result of contraceptive failure if the parent was using an intrauterine device, or the sterilization of either parent. (e) The law does not apply if the child was born into a family that has not received aid during two consecutive months.Section 15200 of the Welfare and Institutions Code of 1995 applies to children conceived when either parent was a nonneedy caretaker relative. It does not apply to any child who is no longer living in the same home with either parent. The notification required by this section shall set forth the provisions of this section and shall state explicitly the impact these provisions would have on the future aid to the assistance unit. The department shall seek all appropriate federal waivers for the implementation of this provision.", "summary": "Existing law requires each county to provide cash assistance and other social services to needy families through the California Work Opportunity and Responsibility to Kids (CalWORKs) program using federal Temporary Assistance to Needy Families (TANF) block grant program, state, and county funds. Under existing law, for purposes of determining a family\u2019s maximum aid payment under the CalWORKs program, the number of needy persons in the same family is not increased for any child born into a family that has received aid under the CalWORKs program continuously for the 10 months prior to the birth of the child, with specified exceptions.\nThis bill would repeal that exclusion for purposes of determining the family\u2019s maximum aid payment and would expressly prohibit the denial of aid, or the denial of an increase in the maximum aid payment, if a child, on whose behalf aid or an increase in aid is being requested, was born into an applicant\u2019s or recipient\u2019s family while the applicant\u2019s or recipient\u2019s family was receiving aid under the CalWORKs program. The bill would specify that an applicant or recipient is not entitled to an increased benefit payment for any month prior to January 1, 2016, as a result of the repeal of that exclusion or the enactment of that express prohibition. The bill would also prohibit the department from conditioning an applicant\u2019s or recipient\u2019s eligibility for aid on the applicant\u2019s or recipient\u2019s disclosure of information regarding rape, incest, or contraception, as specified, or the applicant\u2019s or recipient\u2019s use of contraception.\nExisting law continuously appropriates moneys from the General Fund to defray a portion of county aid grant costs under the CalWORKs program.\nThis bill would declare that no appropriation would be made for purposes of the bill.\nTo the extent that this bill affects eligibility under the CalWORKs program, the bill would create a state-mandated local program.\nThe California Constitution requires the state to reimburse local agencies and school districts for certain costs mandated by the state. Statutory provisions establish procedures for making that reimbursement.\nThis bill would provide that, if the Commission on State Mandates determines that the bill contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement for those costs shall be made pursuant to these statutory provisions.", "title": "An act to add Section 11270.5 to, and to repeal Section 11450.04 of, the Welfare and Institutions Code, relating to CalWORKs."}, {"text": "On January 1, 2013, the California legislature amended Section 7522 of the State of California Government Code to require public employees to participate in a defined benefit pension plan offered by a public employer. The amended law applies to all state and local public retirement systems and to their participating employers, including the Public Employees\u2019 Retirement System, the State Teachers\u2019 Retirement system, the Legislators\u2019 RetirementSystem, the Judges' Retirement System II, county and district retirement systems created pursuant to the County Employees Retirement Law of 1937 (Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 31450) of Part 3 of Division 4 of the Federal Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 1001 et seq.) of the Education Code, and to individual retirement plans offered by public employers. The law does not apply to public employees whose interests are protected under Section 5333(b) of Title 49 of the United States Code until a federal district court rules that the application of this article precludes certification under that section, or until January 1, 2016, whichever is sooner. An individual who was employed by any public employer before January 1, 2013 and became subject to a different defined benefit plan in a different public retirement system offered by his or her employer shall be subject to that plan as it would have been available to employees who were first employed by the subsequent employer on or before December 31, 2012, if the individual was subject to concurrent membership for which creditable service was performed in the previous six months or reciprocity established under any of the following provisions: (a) The law will not apply if the public employer began participation in that plan prior to January 1, 2013. (b) The benefit plan required by this article must be determined and certified by the retirement system\u2019s chief actuary and the retirement board to have no greater risk and no greater cost to the employer than the defined benefit formula required by the law. (c) The plan must conform to the requirements of this law or must be approved by the Legislature. (d)New members of the defined benefit plan may only participate in the lower cost defined benefit formula that was in place before January 1, 2013, or a defined contribution plan that conforms to the requirements of this article or is approved by the Legislature as provided in this subdivision.<n>If a public employer offers a retirement benefit plan that consists solely of a defined contributions plan, that employer may continue to offer that plan instead of the pension plan required by this article. However, if the employer adopts a new defined benefit pension plan on or after January 1, 2013 that plan or formula must be determined and certified by the retirement system\u2019s chief actuary and the system's board to have no greater risk and no greater cost to the employer than the defined benefits formula required by the law. The Legislature finds and declares that a special law is necessary because of the need to clarify the benefit eligibility rules under the California Public Employees\u2019 Pension Reform Act of 2013 and maintain the integrity of that act and further its purpose.", "summary": "The California Public Employees\u2019 Pension Reform Act of 2013 (PEPRA) requires a public retirement system, as defined, to modify its plan or plans to comply with the act and, among other provisions, establishes new retirement formulas that may not be exceeded by a public employer offering a defined benefit pension plan for employees first hired on or after January 1, 2013. Existing law, the Joint Exercise of Powers Act, generally authorizes 2 or more public agencies, by agreement, to jointly exercise any common power, which may include hiring employees and establishing retirement systems. PEPRA authorizes a joint powers authority formed by the Cities of Brea and Fullerton on or after January 1, 2013, to provide its employees the defined benefit plan or formula that those employees received from their respective employers prior to the exercise of a common power, to which the employee is associated, by the joint powers authority to any employee of specified cities who is not a new member and subsequently is employed by the joint powers authority within 180 days of the city providing for the exercise of a common power, to which the employee was associated, by the joint powers authority.\nThis bill would authorize a joint powers authority formed by the Belmont Fire Protection District, the Estero Municipal Improvement District, and the City of San Mateo on or after January 1, 2013, to provide employees who are not new members under PEPRA with the defined benefit plan or formula that was received by those employees from their respective employers on December 31, 2012, if they are employed by the joint powers authority within 180 days of the agency providing for the exercise of a common power, to which the employee was associated, by the joint powers authority. The bill would prohibit the formation of a joint powers authority on or after January 1, 2013, in a manner that would exempt a new employee or a new member from the requirements of PEPRA.\nThis bill would make legislative findings and declarations as to the necessity of a special statute for the Belmont Fire Protection District, the Estero Municipal Improvement District, and the City of San Mateo.", "title": "An act to amend Section 7522.02 of the Government Code, relating to public employees\u2019 retirement."}, {"text": "The California Department of Food and Agriculture today announced new regulations regarding the use of medically important antimicrobial drugs in livestock. The new regulations will take effect on January 1, 2018 and apply to all livestock raised, kept, or used for profit in the state. According to the new regulations, an antimicrobial drug must be used in the professional judgment of a licensed veterinarian when it is necessary to treat a disease or infection or to control the spread of a disease. The regulations do not apply to bees or those species that are usually kept as pets, such as dogs, cats, and pet birds. The department will coordinate with the federal Centers for Disease Control and Prevention and the U.S. Department of Agriculture in the development of new guidelines for the proper use of antimicrobial drugs for disease treatment, control, and prevention of livestock infections.A person who violates this chapter shall be liable for a civil penalty of not more than two hundred and fifty dollars ($250) for each day a violation occurs. In addition to the administrative fine, the violator shall attend an educational program on the judicious use of medically important antimicrobial drugs that has been approved by the secretary.<n>The department shall consult with, and conduct outreach to, livestock producers, licensed veterinarians, and any other relevant stakeholders on the implementation of the monitoring efforts. The department has the authority to request and receive copies of veterinary feed directives from the livestock owner, veterinarian, or distributor to fully implement the provisions of this chapter.", "summary": "(1)\u00a0Existing law regulates the distribution and use of livestock drugs, as defined, by the Secretary of Food and Agriculture. Existing law also requires a person to obtain a license from the secretary to manufacture, sell, distribute, or store commercial feed, including commercial feed containing drugs.\nThis bill would, beginning January 1, 2018, prohibit the administration of medically important antimicrobial drugs, as defined, to livestock unless ordered by a licensed veterinarian through a prescription or veterinary feed directive pursuant to a veterinarian-client-patient relationship, as specified, and would prohibit the administration of a medically important antimicrobial drug to livestock solely for purposes of promoting weight gain or improving feed efficiency. The bill would require the Department of Food and Agriculture, in consultation with the Veterinary Medical Board, the State Department of Public Health, universities, and cooperative extensions, to develop antimicrobial stewardship guidelines and best management practices on the proper use of medically important antimicrobial drugs and would require the department to gather information on medically important antimicrobial drug sales and usage, antimicrobial resistant bacteria, and livestock management practice data. The bill would require information provided pursuant to those provisions to be held confidential, as specified. The bill would authorize the department to request and receive copies of veterinary feed directives from certain persons to implement the bill\u2019s provisions. The bill would make a first violation of the bill\u2019s provisions subject to a civil penalty of up to $250 for each day a violation occurs, and would make second and subsequent violations subject to an administrative fine of $500 for each day a violation occurs, except as specified.\n(2)\u00a0Existing constitutional provisions require that a statute that limits the right of access to the meetings of public bodies or the writings of public officials and agencies be adopted with findings demonstrating the interest protected by the limitation and the need for protecting that interest.\nThis bill would make legislative findings to that effect.", "title": "An act to add Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 14400) to Division 7 of the Food and Agricultural Code, relating to livestock."}]}